Utah statutes.
23-17-4.   Crop damage by pheasants -- Notice to division.

Whenever pheasants are damaging cultivated crops on cleared and planted land, the owner of such crops shall immediately upon discovery of such damage notify the Division of Wildlife Resources. This notice must be made both orally and in writing. Upon being notified of such damage, the Division of Wildlife Resources shall, as far as possible, control such damage.

